Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB326.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(c)(1) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3. Authority to Control.--* * *(b.1) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (a), if a substance is added to the schedules as a controlled substance under Federal law, the secretary shall similarly schedule the substance as a controlled substance under this act and transmit a notice to the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin, which may not occur earlier than 30 days from publication in the Federal Register of the final order.(2) If, within 30 days of publication of the final order in the Federal Register, the secretary objects or a party adversely affected files with the secretary a substantial written objection to the addition of the substance as a controlled substance under this act, the secretary shall transmit to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin a notice of the reasons for the objection or the substantial written objections and shall afford all interested parties an opportunity to be heard by the secretary.(3) After conclusion of the hearing required under clause (2), the secretary shall issue an order as to whether the substance is scheduled in accordance with clause (1) as a controlled substance under this act, and shall transmit the order to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(4) If, within 30 days of publication of the final order in the Federal Register, neither the secretary objects nor a party adversely affected files with the secretary a substantial written objection to the addition, the secretary shall transmit an order to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The order shall state that the substance is scheduled in accordance with clause (1) as a controlled substance under this act.(5) A rule published in accordance with clause (3) or (4) shall take effect upon publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.20250SB0326PN0256 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the secretary finds that the health and safety of the public will not be adversely affected, the secretary may:[(1) Reschedule any controlled substance to coincide with Federal law, including the Controlled Substances Act (Public Law 91-513, 84 Stat. 1236), regulations promulgated under 21 CFR Ch. 2 (relating to drug enforcement administration, department of justice) or any Federal judicial order. The secretary shall publish a notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the rescheduling of a controlled substance under this clause. The rescheduling of the controlled substance to a higher schedule may not take effect earlier than thirty days after publication of the notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The rescheduling of a controlled substance to a lower schedule may take effect upon publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0326PN0256 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617